Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 116 of Title 25, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
If the State of Oklahoma or any political subdivision thereof
properly submits a legal notice, advertisement, or publication to a
newspaper for publishing and such governmental entity has otherwise
met all statutory publication requirements and deadlines, it shall
not be liable for failing to comply with publication deadlines
provided by law or administrative rule in the event that a newspaper
fails to correctly publish such legal notice, advertisement, or
publication. The electronic publication of such legal notice,
Req. No. 15630 Page 1

adve rtisement, or publication may be used in conjunction with any
publication method the governmental entity determines in good faith
is feasible to meet the notice requirements.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15630 MJ 12/31/25


















Req. No. 15630 Page 2